Hawaii statutes.
§514B-67 Termination of registration.
(a) The commission, after notice and hearing, may issue an order terminating
the registration of a condominium project upon determination that a developer,
or any officer, principal, or affiliate of a developer has:

(1) Failed to comply with a cease and desist order
issued by the commission affecting that condominium project;

(2) Concealed, diverted, or disposed of any funds or
assets of any person in a manner impairing rights of purchasers of units in
that condominium project;

(3) Failed to perform any stipulation or agreement
made to induce the commission to issue an order relating to that condominium
project;

(4) Misrepresented or failed to disclose a material
fact in the application for registration;

(5) Failed to meet any of the conditions described in
this part necessary to qualify for registration; or

(6) Failed to conform or comply with county zoning
and development ordinances as required by chapter 205, including section
205-4.6 where applicable, and section 514B-5.

(b) A developer may not convey, cause to be
conveyed, or contract for the conveyance of any interest in a unit while an
order revoking the registration of the condominium project is in effect,
without the consent of the commission.

(c) The commission may issue a cease and
desist order in lieu of an order of revocation where appropriate. [L 2005, c
93, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 49, §7]

Note

Applicability of 2014 amendment. L 2014, c 49, §10.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next